Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6030.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406uu. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a group disability insurance policy shall do all of the following: (a) Consider the closure of a health system or the removal of a health system from the insurer's network as a qualifying event for a special enrollment period. (b) Allow an insured to terminate the group disability insurance policy without penalty if a health system in the insurer's network is closed or removed from the insurer's network. (c) Offer a group disability insurance policy to an insured whose group disability policy with another insurer was affected by the closure or removal of a health system in the other insurer's network. (d) If the insurer offers a group disability insurance policy under the circumstances described in subdivision (c), credit the insured any deductibles or out-of-pocket maximum that the insured paid under the other insurer's group disability insurance policy. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Health system" means an entity or affiliated group of entities under common ownership, governance, or control that operates or manages 1 or more hospitals and may also include physician practices, outpatient facilities, long-term care facilities, laboratories, and other health-care-related operations. (b) "Qualifying event" means that term as described in 45 CFR 155.420. (c) "Special enrollment period" means that term as described in 45 CFR 155.420.